Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6215
Practitioner, defined.

Practitioner shall mean an individual who has achieved knowledge and skill by the practice of a specified health profession and is actively engaged in such profession.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 15.